Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0380.
people of the state of michigan enact: ARTICLE I Sec. 4. The word "demote" means to suspend without pay for 15 or more consecutive days or reduce compensation for a particular school year by more than an amount equivalent to 30 days' compensation or to transfer to a position carrying a lower salary. However, demote Demote does not include the discontinuance of salary under section 3 of article IV, the discontinuance or reduction of performance-based compensation under section 1250a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1250a, or a reduction in personnel, including, but not limited to, a reduction in workweeks or workdays. ARTICLE II Sec. 2a. A probationary teacher who is rated as effective or highly effective on the probationary teacher's most recent year-end performance evaluation under section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249, is not subject to displacement by a teacher on continuing tenure solely because the other teacher has continuing tenure. Sec. 3b. (1) Before July 1, 2024, and except Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a probationary teacher is not considered to have successfully completed the probationary period unless the teacher has been rated as effective or highly effective on the teacher's 3 most recent year-end performance evaluations under section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249, and has completed at least 5 full school years of employment in a probationary period. (2) Before July 1, 2024, if If a probationary teacher has been rated as highly effective on 3 consecutive year-end performance evaluations under section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249, and has completed at least 4 full school years of employment in a probationary period, the teacher is considered to have successfully completed the probationary period. (3) Beginning July 1, 2024, if a teacher has been rated as effective on or after July 1, 2024, or effective or highly effective before July 1, 2024, on 3 of the teacher's year-end performance evaluations, including the most recent year-end performance evaluation, under section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249, and has completed at least 4 full school years of employment in a probationary period, the teacher is considered to have successfully completed the probationary period. ARTICLE III Sec. 3. The controlling board of the school district employing a teacher on continuing tenure shall ensure that the teacher is provided with a year-end performance evaluation in accordance with section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249. If the teacher has received a needing-support rating of ineffective or minimally effective on a year-end performance evaluation, the school district shall provide the teacher with an individualized development plan developed by appropriate administrative personnel in consultation with the individual teacher. The individualized development plan must require the teacher to make progress toward individual development goals within a specified time period, not to exceed 180 days. The year-end performance evaluation must be based on multiple classroom observations conducted during the period covered by the evaluation and must include, in addition to the factors required under section 1249 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1249, at least an assessment of the teacher's progress in meeting the goals of the teacher's individualized development plan. The controlling board shall determine the format and number of the classroom observations in consultation with teachers and school administrators. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 379 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.